Massachusetts, session 194th, H2057.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION ONE. Chapter 271 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 52. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“First responder”, shall include any law enforcement officer, a paid, call, reserve or
volunteer firefighter, a paid, call, reserve or volunteer emergency medical technician, or any
other person whose usual and regular duties include rendering assistance at the scene of a crime,
accident or other emergency.
“Harass”, means to willfully engage in a course of conduct directed at a first responder
which intentionally causes substantial emotional distress in that first responder and serves no
legitimate purpose.
of 2

(b) No person, after receiving a verbal warning not to approach from a person he or she
knows or reasonably should know is a first responder and who is engaged in the lawful
performance of a legal duty, shall knowingly and willfully violate such warning and approach or
remain within 25 feet of the first responder with the intent to impede or interfere with the first
responder’s ability to perform such duty, threaten the first responder with physical harm, or
harass the first responder.
(c) Any violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000 for
the first offense, and for each and every subsequent offense, by a fine or not more than $5,000 or
imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both.
of 2